Washington statutes.
RCW 33.04.054

Cease and desist order—Enforcement—Jurisdiction.

The director may apply to the superior court of the county of the principal place of business of the association affected for the enforcement of any effective and outstanding order issued under RCW 33.04.042, 33.04.044, or 33.04.048, and the court shall have jurisdiction to order compliance therewith.

No court shall have jurisdiction to affect by injunction or otherwise the issuance or enforcement of any order or to review, modify, suspend, terminate, or set aside any order except as provided in RCW 33.04.046 and 33.04.052.

[ 1994 c 92 s 423; 1982 c 3 s 12.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.